New York, session 2025-2026, A10444.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 709-b 2 to read as follows: 3 § 709-b. Administration of the volunteer fire infrastructure and 4 response equipment (V-FIRE) grant program. 1. Funds available under the 5 volunteer fire infrastructure and response equipment (V-FIRE) grant 6 program administered by the division shall be awarded in equal amounts 7 to each region of the state which have eligible departments. Regions 8 shall be as established in article eleven of the economic development 9 law with the exception of the New York city region. The division shall 10 establish criteria for each region designed to identify eligible fire 11 departments within each region with the greatest needs. Such criteria 12 may limit eligibility to wholly volunteer districts but shall not 13 prohibit awards on the basis of the size of the department's operating 14 budget. 15 2. Solely for the purposes of this section and notwithstanding any 16 conflicting provision of law, eligible departments within the city of 17 New York shall be considered a part of the Long Island region. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13543-07-6